src-fst-morphology-affixes-adv.lexc.md
# Adverb inflection
Most adverbs are morphologically either sti-derivations of adjectives or
some specific form of an existing or archaic noun, and they have limited
inflection in form of possessives and clitics carried over. According to
modern dictionaries different forms of same root are separate adverbs,
so they are not inflected here, but listed in roots.

* Adverb possessive back examples:*
* *takanani:* `takana+Adv+PxSg1` (Eng. # behind me)

* Adverb possessive front examples:*
* *edessäni:* `edessä+Adv+PxSg1` (Eng. # in front of me)

* Adverb possessive back an examples:*
* *takanaan:* `takana+Adv+PxSg3`

* Adverb possessive back en examples:*
* *jalkeilleen:* `jalkeille+Adv+PxSg3` (Eng. # he awakened)

* Adverb possessive front en examples:*
* *keskelleen:* `keskelle+Adv+PxPl3` (Eng. # amidst them)

* Adverb possessive front än examples:*
* *edessään:* `edessä+Adv+PxSg3`

* Adverb clitic back examples:*
* *nopeastihan:* `nopeasti+Adv+Foc/han` (Eng. # fast)

* Adverb clitic front examples:*
* *tyhmästihän:* `tyhmästi+Adv+Foc/han` (Eng. # stupidly)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adv.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adv.lexc)</small>

---
